Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
County Cooperative Service District

§ 19-3-101.
Creation of county cooperative service district.

The board of supervisors of any county in this state may, by order duly entered on its minutes, join with any other county or counties in this state to establish a county cooperative service district for the purpose of instituting planning and mutual cooperation among counties to improve the delivery of services to, and the provision of benefits for, all citizens of participating counties by the joint financing, construction and administration of governmental services and facilities.

Any power, authority or responsibility which may be lawfully exercised by a county, except for the imposition of taxes, may be exercised jointly by participating counties through the board of commissioners of a county cooperative service district, hereinafter in Sections 19-3-101 through 19-3-115, Mississippi Code of 1972, referred to as the “district,” unless in a resolution of a board of supervisors creating the district the exercise of a particular power is specifically excluded. The district shall have authority to prepare or have prepared a water resources study or other environmental studies; however, any action by the district which will have an impact upon groundwater resources shall only be implemented consistent with an official statewide water management plan or with the approval of the Commission on Natural Resources.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 519, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 556, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 4, 1990).

§ 19-3-103.
District as public corporation in perpetuity; powers.

From and after the creation of a district, it shall be a public corporation in perpetuity under its corporate name and shall, in that name, be a body politic and corporate, with power of perpetual succession, having all the powers necessary or convenient to effectuate the purpose of Sections 19-3-101 through 19-3-115, including the power:

To adopt, and from time to time amend and repeal, bylaws, rules and regulations not inconsistent with Sections 19-3-101 through 19-3-115 to carry into effect the powers and purposes of the district;

To adopt an official name and seal, and retain and keep minutes of its meetings in a firmly bound minute book in which all actions taken by the district about its business shall be recorded;

To elect from among its members a chairman, vice-chairman and secretary to serve annually;

To maintain an office at such place or places as it may designate, and to employ and compensate an executive director and such other personnel as shall be necessary to exercise the powers and perform the duties provided for in Sections 19-3-101 through 19-3-115;

To make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under Sections 19-3-101 through 19-3-115;

To implement, operate, administer or supervise, directly or indirectly, such programs, services and activities as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes of Sections 19-3-101 through 19-3-115;

To apply for, accept, receive, expend or otherwise dispose of, in furtherance of its functions, funds, grants, services and property from the federal government or its agencies and from departments, agencies and instrumentalities of the state, municipal or county governments;

To cooperate with and execute cooperative agreements with all other federal, state and local governmental agencies in the exercise of its functions under the provisions of Sections 19-3-101 through 19-3-115;

To sue and be sued; and in any suit against the commission, service of process shall be had by service upon the chairman with such process; and

To charge fees, tolls and special assessments to participating counties and any municipality which may have contracted for services to finance the operation, maintenance and debt service of activities and services undertaken by the district.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 519, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 4, 1989).

§ 19-3-105.
Board of commissioners.

The powers of a district shall be vested in and exercised by a board of commissioners consisting of not less than one (1) nor more than five (5) members appointed by the board of supervisors of each participating county. Each commissioner shall be either a member of the board of supervisors or an elected municipal official. Each commissioner shall be appointed and hold office for a term concurrent with the appointing authority. Any vacancy occurring on the board shall be filled by the appointing authority at a regular meeting of the board of supervisors, and unexpired terms shall be filled for the remainder of the term.

Each commissioner shall take and subscribe to the oath of office prescribed in Section 268, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, before the clerk of the appointing board of supervisors that he will faithfully discharge the duties of the office of commissioner, which oath shall be filed with the clerk and by him preserved.

The commissioners so appointed and qualified may be compensated for their services for each meeting of the board of commissioners attended, either regular or special, at the per diem established in Section 25-3-69, Mississippi Code of 1972, and shall be reimbursed for all expenses necessarily incurred in the discharge of their official duties as provided for state officers and employees in Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972.

The board of commissioners may appoint an executive committee, to be composed of not less than one (1) commissioner from each participating county, with a chairman to be designated by the board of commissioners. The executive committee is empowered to execute all powers vested in the full board of commissioners during the interim of the meetings of the board. A majority, plus one (1), of the members of the executive committee shall be a quorum for the transaction of business.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 519; Laws, 1990, ch. 556, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 4, 1990).

§ 19-3-106.
Authority of district to issue revenue bonds.

The board of commissioners of any cooperative service district may, pursuant to a favorable majority vote of the board of supervisors of each participating county, and for good cause shown therefor, authorize the cooperative service district to issue its revenue bonds payable from and secured by a pledge of all or any part of revenues under any contract or contracts it enters into under Sections 19-3-101 through 19-3-115, Mississippi Code of 1972, and/or from the avails of any tax imposed or appropriation made to support the district. The bonds shall not be or constitute an indebtedness of any participating county or municipality within the meaning of any constitutional, statutory or charter limitation of indebtedness but shall be payable solely from the revenues derived by the cooperative service district under any contract or contracts it enters into under Section 19-3-101 through 19-3-115, Mississippi Code of 1972, and/or from the avails of any tax imposed or appropriation made to support the district. Neither the full faith and credit nor taxing power of any participating county, municipality, or of the state or any political subdivision thereof, is pledged to the payment of the principal of, the interest on, or premium, if any, of the bonds. Such bonds shall be in such form and denomination as prescribed by the board of commissioners of the district. Such bonds may be serial or term; redeemable, with or without premium, or nonredeemable; registered or coupon bonds with registration privileges as to either principal and interest, principal only, or both; shall bear interest at a rate or rates to be determined pursuant to the sale of the bonds; and shall be payable at such time or times and shall mature at such time or times not exceeding twenty-five (25) years from their date, and at such place or places as shall be prescribed in the bond resolution authorizing their issuance; provided, however, that any bond issue to be awarded and sold to the United States of America or any agency thereof shall mature at such time or times, not to exceed thirty-five (35) years, as shall be prescribed in the ordinance authorizing their issuance. Any provisions of the general laws to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds and interest coupons issued pursuant to the authority of this subsection shall possess all the qualities of negotiable instruments. The bonds and the interest coupons shall be executed in such manner and shall be substantially in the form prescribed in the authorizing resolution. In case any of the officers whose signatures or countersignatures appear on the bonds or interest coupons shall cease to be such officers before delivery of such bonds, such signatures or countersignatures shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if they had remained in office until such delivery. No bond shall bear more than one (1) rate of interest; each bond shall bear interest from its date to its stated maturity date at the interest rate specified in the bid; all bonds of the same maturity shall bear the same rate of interest from date to maturity; all interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bond may be for any period not exceeding one (1) year.

No interest payment shall be evidenced by more than one (1) coupon and neither cancelled nor supplemental coupons shall be permitted; the lowest interest rate specified for any bonds issued shall not be less than seventy percent (70%) of the highest rate specified for the same bond issue. Such bonds shall not bear a greater overall maximum interest rate to maturity than that allowed in Section 75-17-103, Mississippi Code of 1972. Each interest rate specified in any bid must be in multiples of one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%) or in multiples of one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%). If serial bonds, such bonds shall mature annually, and the first maturity date thereof shall not be more than five (5) years from the date of such bonds. Such bonds shall be legal investments for trustees and other fiduciaries, and for savings banks, trust companies and insurance companies organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi. The bonds and interest coupons shall be exempt from all state, county, municipal and other taxation under the laws of the State of Mississippi. Such bonds shall be sold at public or private sale upon such terms as the board of commissioners of the district may determine, not inconsistent with the provisions of this subsection, but no sale shall be made at a price so low as to require the payment of interest on the money received therefor at more than that allowed in Section 75-17-103, Mississippi Code of 1972, computed with relation to the absolute maturity of the bonds, in accordance with standard tables of bond values, excluding from such computation the amount of any premium to be paid on redemption of any bonds prior to maturity.

All bonds issued pursuant to this subsection shall be validated as provided in Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11, Mississippi Code of 1972.

Proceeds from the sale of bonds issued pursuant to this subsection may be invested, pending their use, in such certificates of deposit as are specified in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or the trust indenture securing them, and the earnings on such investments applied as provided in such resolution or trust indenture.

All bonds issued pursuant to this subsection are declared to be legal and authorized investments for banks, savings banks, trust companies, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, insurance companies, fiduciaries, trustees and for the sinking fund of municipalities, villages, school districts or any other political corporation or subdivision of the State of Mississippi. Such bonds shall constitute a district indebtedness within the meaning of Section 19-3-107, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 556, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 4, 1990).

§ 19-3-107.
County terminating participation in district.

The operation and management of a district is vested solely in its board of commissioners; however, a participating county may terminate its participation in a district by a majority vote of its board of supervisors, but such board of supervisors shall have no power to terminate its participation until it has paid its pro rata share of any outstanding district indebtedness of any kind.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 519, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 4, 1989).

§ 19-3-109.
Audit of district.

A district shall be audited from time to time by the State Auditor pursuant to the provisions of Section 7-7-211, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 519, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 4, 1989).

§ 19-3-111.
Appropriation of funds.

The board of supervisors of each participating county and the governing authorities of each municipality located therein are authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to appropriate and pay such sums as they deem necessary and desirable, out of any available funds of the county or municipality which are not required for any other purpose, to the district in which the county or municipality is located.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 519, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 4, 1989).

§ 19-3-113.
Levy of tax.

The board of supervisors of any participating county is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to levy a tax not to exceed one-half (1/2) mill annually on all taxable property within the county the proceeds of which shall be used to support the district in which the county is located. The proceeds of such tax shall not be included within the ten percent (10%) increase limitation under Section 27-39-321, Mississippi Code of 1972.

In addition to the tax authorized to be imposed in subsection (1) of this section, a participating county may impose special fees, tolls and special assessments for projects or services undertaken by the district in which the county is located in order to defray the expenses of the district related to such projects or services.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 519, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 4, 1989).

§ 19-3-115.
Contractual powers of municipality.

Any municipality located within a cooperative service district may, pursuant to a duly adopted resolution of the governing body, and upon concurrence by the board of commissioners of the service district, enter into contracts with the district to provide, obtain or receive any services provided by the district or to otherwise cooperate and participate through contract in the delivery of services provided by the district which the municipality has the power, authority or responsibility to exercise. In each instance, the contract shall provide the district sufficient payment to enable the district to meet its expenses, including any debt service as a result of any projects of the service district for which the contract is entered.

Any municipality which has contracted with a cooperative service district may terminate its contract with the district by a majority vote of the governing authorities, but the governing authorities of a municipality shall have no power to terminate a contract with the district until the municipality has paid all outstanding debts for the services it has received pursuant to the contract.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 519, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 4, 1989).